foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C12.lexc
LEXICON CIru12Inf


%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்போம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ந்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிக்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிக்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றேன் #;

LEXICON ClassIru12
விதித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
விசனித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வலத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
திமிர்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துவந்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தமித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தொந்தரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தேர்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மளமளத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மாய்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மடித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கவர்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
குடுகுடுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கெமிளித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கடுகடுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிரவர்த்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிசுபிசுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பரிவேட்டித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பாலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பூஷித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நிறத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நாணித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நேர்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சினைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சுளித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சமித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
செழுசெழுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சந்தேகித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சங்கரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒப்பித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
என்பித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
இலைச்சித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஆகரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உடுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அருத்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அனுசரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சிறந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நடந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
விரண்டிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மென்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சூன்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
குமிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மலைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
திதைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தேர்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சுரிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வசிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பதிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஞெலிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உலைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நசிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அழிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
குறாவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
குன்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கிண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கருளியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கோரியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
வவ்வியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
விரட்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
வணங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
புகுத்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பயிற்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பசப்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பதறியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொருமியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
முங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மிறுங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மருக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சுற்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சிக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சீந்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
செருமியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
துயக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
துன்னியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
திருக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தாண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தோண்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நுணாவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நிவறியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நீடியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நழுக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நொந்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒஃகியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
எறட்டியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
உறங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
உருகியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
இறங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
இழிசியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அம்மியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அணாப்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அராத்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பெட்டிரு      CIru12Inf; 
விடைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வக்கணித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துளிர்த்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
தெரிவித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மின்னலித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
மறுதளித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
குலுகுலுத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கலகித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிணைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பாதுகாத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
பூவித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நரைத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சிரத்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சத்தித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
சகளீகரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒழித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
இமிசித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
உத்தரித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அதித்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
குறந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அலந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
போன்றிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மரிந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
துணா்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
வகைந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
போழ்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
நூர்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
அவிழ்ந்திரு      CIru12Inf; 
கிடத்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
கெழுமியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
விலவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
வெருவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பிதற்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பொளுக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மறுகியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
மூசியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
சினவியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
துவற்றியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தியங்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
தெள்ளியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நம்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
நருக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
ஒல்லியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
உற்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
இறுக்கியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அப்பியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
அருந்தியிரு      CIru12Inf; 
பூண்டிரு      CIru12Inf; 
